Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,151
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Voluntary dissolution; dissolution by incorporators or initial directors.

A majority of the incorporators or initial directors of a corporation that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may dissolve the corporation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution that set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The date of its incorporation;

(3) Either (a) that none of the corporation's shares has been issued or (b) that the corporation has not commenced business;

(4) That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

(5) That the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders if shares were issued; and

(6) That a majority of the incorporators or initial directors authorized the dissolution.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 151.